Utah statutes.

77-23-102.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Administrative traffic checkpoint" means a roadblock procedure where
enforcement officers stop all, or a designated sequence of, motor vehicles
traveling on highways and roads and subject those vehicles to inspection or
testing and the drivers or occupants to questioning or the production of
documents.
(2)  "Command level officer" includes all sheriffs, heads of law enforcement
agencies, and all supervisory enforcement officers of sergeant rank or higher.
(3)  "Emergency circumstances" means circumstances where enforcement officers
reasonably believe road conditions, weather conditions, or persons present a
significant hazard to persons or the property of other persons.
(4)  "Enforcement officer" includes:
(a)  peace officers as defined in Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer
Classifications;
(b)  correctional officers as defined in Title 53, Chapter 13;
(c)  special function officers as defined and under the restrictions of Title
53, Chapter 13; and
(d)  federal officers as defined in Title 53, Chapter 13.
(5)  "Magistrate" includes all judicial officers enumerated in Subsection
77-1-3(4).
(6)  "Motor vehicle" includes all vehicles as defined in Title 41, Chapter 1a.
